District of Columbia statutes.
35-252

Carrier authorized to refuse transportation to violators.

A carrier may refuse to transport a person or persons whose immediately observed conduct or behavior would constitute a violation of § 35-216 or § 35-251.

History

Sept. 23, 1975, D.C. Law 1-18, § 3, 22 DCR 1995
Feb. 22, 1978, D.C. Law 2-40, § 2, 24 DCR 3344

Section References

This section is referenced in § 35-251.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 44-225.
1973 Ed., § 44-217.